Louisiana, session 2026, SB382.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1034.2(C)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1034.2. Reimbursement schedule
* * *
C.(1)(a) The reimbursement schedule shall include charges limited to the
mean of the usual and customary charges for such care, services, treatment, drugs,
and supplies. Except as provided for in Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph, any
Any necessary adjustments to the reimbursement schedule adopted and established
in accordance with the provisions of this Section may be made annually.
(b) The assistant secretary shall reassess the reimbursement schedule
provided for in this Section and shall promulgate and implement any necessary
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 382 ENROLLED
adjustments to the schedule no later than July 1, 2029."
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 23:1294 and R.S. 36:309(B)(2) are hereby repealed.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.